Louisiana, session 2026, HB615.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:19(A)(1)(c) and 23(B) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§19. Notice of meetings
A.(1)
* * *
(c) Each public body subject to R.S. 42:23(B)(2) 42:23(B) shall include on
its written public notice sufficient information to enable the public to locate the
broadcast for viewing.
* * *
§23. Audio and video recordings; live broadcast
* * *
B.(1)(a) Each nonelected board or commission that has the authority to levy
a tax of the following shall video or audio record, film, or broadcast live all
proceedings in a public meeting.:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-901 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 615
(i) Each nonelected board or commission that has the authority to levy a tax,
except a board or commission that represents a district that is contained entirely
within a municipality having a population of less than ten thousand persons as of the
latest federal decennial census or that is contained entirely within a parish having a
population of less than twenty-five thousand persons as of the latest federal decennial
census.
(ii) Each state board or commission that is authorized to promulgate rules
pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.
(iii) Each state board or commission that is authorized to impose a fine or
fee.
(b) Each meeting shall be video recorded and made available to the public
in an online archive located on the website of the board or commission or on a social
media platform for at least two years.
(2)(a)(i) The parish governing authority in a parish with a population of
twenty-five thousand or more shall broadcast live all of its proceedings in public
meetings, including the parish governing authority's committee meetings.
(ii) Each school board in a parish with a population of twenty-five thousand
or more shall broadcast live all of its proceedings in public meetings, including the
school board's committee meetings.
(iii) Each governing authority of a municipality with a population of ten
thousand or more shall broadcast live all city council meetings including city council
committee meetings. There is no requirement to broadcast a committee meeting
where members are volunteers.
(b) (3) For purposes of this Paragraph Subsection, "broadcast live" means
the publicly available distribution of audio and video of a meeting in real or near real
time via the internet or television broadcast.
(c) (4) The failure of a public body to broadcast live as required by this
Paragraph Subsection due to a technological failure beyond the control of the public
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-901 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 615
body or beyond its ability to resolve timely is not a violation of the provisions of this
Chapter.
(d) (5) The requirement in this Paragraph Subsection for a public body to
broadcast its meetings does not apply to any executive session held in accordance
with this Chapter.
* * *